Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.080

Livestock inspection—Facilities required—Help to be furnished.

Every certified feed lot shall be equipped with a facility or a livestock pen, approved by the director as to location and construction within the feed lot so that necessary livestock inspection can be carried on in a proper, expeditious and safe manner. Each licensee shall furnish the director with sufficient help necessary to carry out inspections in the manner set forth above.

[ 2003 c 326 s 52; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.